Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-2120
State Department of Education; certification of students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches.

On or before March 1, 2009, and February 1 of each year thereafter, for purposes of determining socioeconomic diversity of enrollment as defined in section 79-2110, the State Department of Education shall certify to each learning community and each member school district the average percentage of students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches in each school building in each member school district and in the aggregate for all school buildings in the learning community based on the most current information available to the department on the immediately preceding January 1. For purposes of this section, the average percentage of students qualifying for free or reduced-price lunches in school buildings that provide free meals to all students pursuant to the community eligibility provision shall equal the identified student percentage, multiplied by 1.6, calculated pursuant to the community eligibility provision. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2009, LB62, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB1066, § 22.